Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.750

Monitoring of persons charged with or convicted of misdemeanors—Decisions concerning release of criminal offenders—Findings.

The legislature finds that the provision of preconviction and postconviction misdemeanor probation and supervision services, and the monitoring of persons charged with or convicted of misdemeanors to ensure their compliance with preconviction or postconviction orders of the court, are essential to improving the safety of the public in general. Furthermore, the legislature finds that decisions concerning whether criminal offenders are released into the community pretrial or postconviction, including the revocation of probation, rest with the judiciary.

[ 2007 c 174 s 1.]